Utah statutes.
78B-3-407.   Limitation on actions against health care providers when parent or guardian refuses to consent to health care of child.

(1)  A malpractice action against a health care provider may not be brought on the basis of the consequences resulting from the refusal of a child's parent or guardian to consent to the child's health care, if:

(a)  the health care is recommended by the health care provider;

(b)  the parent or guardian is provided with sufficient information to make an informed decision regarding the recommendation of the health care provider; and

(c)  the consent of the parent or guardian is required by law before the health care may be administered.

(2)  The sole purpose of this section is to prohibit a malpractice action against a health care provider under the circumstances set forth by this section.  This section may not be construed to:

(a)  create a new cause of action;

(b)  expand an existing cause of action;

(c)  impose a new duty on a health care provider; or

(d)  expand an existing duty of a health care provider.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

